Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-20,178
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298; Laws 2015, LB157, § 10. Operative date January 1, 2017. Foreign corporation; withdrawal.

(1) A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state may not withdraw from this state until it obtains a certificate of withdrawal from the Secretary of State.

(2) A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state may apply for a certificate of withdrawal by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing. The application shall set forth:

(a) The name of the foreign corporation and the name of the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

(b) That it is not transacting business in this state and that it surrenders its authority to transact business in this state;

(c) That it revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on its behalf and consents that service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time it was authorized to transact business in this state may thereafter be made on such corporation outside this state; and

(d) A mailing address at which process against the corporation may be served.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 178.